Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB105.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2106 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 2106. Imposition of Tax.--(a) An inheritance tax for the use of the Commonwealth is imposed upon every transfer subject to tax under this article at the rates specified in section 2116.(b) An amount of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of a decedent's estate shall be exempt from the tax imposed under paragraph (1). The amount exempt under this 12345678910111213141516171819202122 paragraph shall be apportioned among the transfers from the estate subject to the tax in proportion to the amount of the transfer to the entire estate.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0105PN0084 - 2 - 1234